Utah statutes.
26-18-7.   Medical vendor rates.
Medical vendor payments made to providers of services for and in behalf of
recipient households shall be based upon predetermined rates from standards
developed by the division in cooperation with providers of services for each
type of service purchased by the division.  As far as possible, the rates paid
for services shall be established in advance of the fiscal year for which
funds are to be requested.
